Utah statutes.
10-18-103.   Antitrust immunity.

(1)  When a municipality is offering or providing a cable television service or public telecommunications service, the immunity from antitrust liability afforded to political subdivisions of the state under Section 76-10-3109 does not apply to the municipality providing those services.

(2)  A municipality that provides a cable television service or a public telecommunications service is subject to applicable antitrust liabilities under the federal Local Government Antitrust Act of 1984, 15 U.S.C. Secs. 34 to 36.



Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

